Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2318
Appeal of ruling or decision; finding regarding indigency; effect on appointment of counsel for defendant; fees and expenses.

When a notice is filed in cases where the court finds a defendant to be indigent, the trial court shall first contact the public defender, in counties with a public defender, to inquire whether or not the public defender is able to accept the appointment to argue the case against the prosecuting attorney. If the public defender declines the appointment because of a conflict of interest, the court shall appoint another attorney. An attorney other than the public defender appointed under this section shall file an application for fees and expenses in the court which appointed such attorney for all fees and expenses reasonably necessary to permit such attorney to effectively and competently represent the defendant and to argue the case against the prosecuting attorney. Such fees and expenses shall be paid out of the treasury of the county in the full amount determined by the court. If the court does not find a defendant indigent and does not appoint the public defender or another attorney, the defendant may be represented by an attorney of the defendant's choice.

Laws 1975, LB 130, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 71;

Laws 2023, LB50, § 17.

The plain language of section 43-2,106.01(2)(d) carves out an exception for delinquency cases in which jeopardy has attached. In such cases, the county attorney is limited to taking exception pursuant to the procedures of this section and sections 29-2317 and 29-2319. In re Interest of Rebecca B., 280 Neb. 137, 783 N.W.2d 783 (2010).

Under section 43-2,106.01(2)(d), when a county attorney files an appeal "in any case determining delinquency issues in which the juvenile has been placed legally in jeopardy," the appeal must be taken by exception proceedings to the district court pursuant to this section and sections 29-2317 and 29-2319. In re Interest of Rebecca B., 280 Neb. 137, 783 N.W.2d 783 (2010).

Separate juvenile courts are treated as county courts under this section and sections 29-2317 and 29-2319 for the purpose of exception proceedings under subsection (2)(d) of section 43-2,106.01. In re Interest of Sean H., 271 Neb. 395, 711 N.W.2d 879 (2006).

The docket fee requirement in section 25-2729 applies to exception proceedings under section 29-2317, this section, and section 29-2319. State v. Graham, 32 Neb. App. 747, 5 N.W.3d 210 (2024).